Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3323
Veterinary medicine and surgery; license; validity.

Any person holding a valid license to practice veterinary medicine and surgery in this state on October 23, 1967, shall be recognized as a licensed veterinarian and shall be entitled to retain such status so long as he or she complies with the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act and the provisions of the Uniform Credentialing Act relating to veterinary medicine and surgery.

Laws 1967, c. 439, § 5, p. 1358;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 57;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,157;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1105.